Massachusetts, session 194th, S948.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15E of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 8 and 12, the words “subject to
appropriation” and by adding the following paragraph:-
Not less than $30,000,000 shall be expended for the purposes of continuing the
implementation of section 15E of chapter 15A of the General Laws to encourage private
fundraising by the Commonwealth’s public institutions of higher education for the endowment
and capital outlay programs of those institutions; provided further, that the board of higher
education shall implement this program in a manner which ensures that each institution shall
have an opportunity to secure matching funds from this item; provided further, that $10,000,000
shall be allocated to the University of Massachusetts; provided further, that $10,000,000 shall be
of 2

allocated to state universities; provided further, that $10,000,000 shall be allocated to community
colleges; provided further, that if any funds allocated herein for disbursement to community
colleges shall be unused, the remaining funds shall be made available to the state universities;
provided further, that if any funds allocated herein for disbursement to state universities shall be
unused, the remaining funds shall be made available to the University of Massachusetts.
of 2